ro-RO: Stilul suportului pentru ace: Carte; Cutie; Husă; Mapă; Suport magnetic; Suport magnetic pentru ace; Săculeț; Rulou; Mânecă/teacă; Tub; Portofel; Altele
zh-TW: 持針器樣式: 書本式; 盒式; 收納盒式; 對折式; 磁吸座; 磁吸護針器; 收納袋式; 捲筒式; 保護套式; 管狀; 皮夾式; 其他
tr: İğne tutucu tipi: Kitap; Kutu; Kılıf; Folyo; Manyetik tutucu; İğne tutucu; Kese; Rulo; Geçmeli kılıf; Tüp; Cüzdan; Diğer
lt-LT: Adatos laikiklio stilius: Knyga; Dėžutė; Dėklas; Aplankas; Magnetinis laikiklis; Adatos laikiklis („Needle minder“); Maišelis; Suvyniojamas; Įmautė; Vamzdelis; Piniginė; Kita
el: Στυλ θήκης βελόνας: Βιβλίο; Κουτί; Θήκη; Ντοσιέ; Μαγνητική βάση; Μαγνητάκι για βελόνες; Πουγκί; Σε ρολό; Περίβλημα; Σωλήνας; Πορτοφόλι; Άλλο
vi: Kiểu dáng kẹp giữ kim: Dạng sách; Hộp; Hộp đựng; Kẹp tài liệu; Khay nam châm; Nam châm giữ kim; Túi nhỏ; Dạng cuộn; Túi bọc; Ống; Ví; Khác
nb: Type nåleholder: Bok; Eske; Etui; Mappe; Magnetisk holder; Nålemagnet; Pung; Rulleetui; Omslag; Rør; Lommebok; Annet
zh-CN: 针托样式: 书本式; 盒式; 盒式; 对折式; 磁性收纳座; 磁性吸针器; 收纳袋; 卷装式; 护套式; 管式; 钱包式; 其他
ja: 針ホルダースタイル: ブック; ボックス; ケース; フォリオ; マグネットホルダー; ニードルマインダー; ポーチ; ロールアップ; スリーブ; チューブ; ウォレット; その他
en: Needle holder style: Book; Box; Case; Folio; Magnetic holder; Needle minder; Pouch; Roll-up; Sleeve; Tube; Wallet; Other
ko: 바늘 홀더 스타일: 책형; 박스; 케이스; 폴리오; 마그네틱 홀더; 니들 마인더; 파우치; 롤업; 슬리브; 튜브; 지갑형; 기타
cs: Styl držáku jehly: Kniha; Krabička; Pouzdro; Desky; Magnetický držák; Magnet na jehly; Kapsička; Rolovací; Obal; Tuba; Peněženka; Ostatní
fi: Neulanpitimen tyyppi: Kirja; Laatikko; Kotelo; Kansio; Magneettipidike; Neulamagneetti; Pussi; Rullattava; Tasku; Putkilo; Lompakko; Muu
it: Stile del porta aghi: A libro; Scatola; Astuccio; Cartella; Supporto magnetico; Calamita per aghi; Bustina; Arrotolabile; Custodia; Tubo; Portafoglio; Altro
pt-BR: Estilo do porta-agulhas: Livro; Caixa; Estojo; Fichário; Suporte magnético; Ímã de agulha; Bolsa; Enrolável; Capa; Tubo; Carteira; Outro
pt-PT: Estilo do porta-agulhas: Livro; Caixa; Estojo; Fólio; Suporte magnético; Descansa agulhas; Bolsa; De enrolar; Capa; Tubo; Carteira; Outro
sv: Typ av nålförare: Bok; Ask; Fodral; Mapp; Magnethållare; Nålmagnet; Påse; Rullfodral; Ficka; Rör; Plånboksmodell; Övrigt
da: Nåleholdertype: Bog; Æske; Etui; Folio; Magnetisk holder; Nålemagnet; Pose; Rul-op; Omslag; Rør; Pung; Andet
bg-BG: Стил на държача за игли: Книга; Кутия; Калъф; Фолио; Магнитен държач; Магнит за игли; Торбичка; Навиващ се; Ръкав; Тръба; Портфейл; Друго
hr-HR: Stil držača igle: Knjiga; Kutija; Kutija; Folio; Magnetski držač; Držač igle; Torbica; Sklopivo u rolu; Navlaka; Tuba; Novčanik; Ostalo
sl-SI: Slog držala za iglo: Knjiga; Škatla; Etui; Mapa (folio); Magnetno držalo; Magnet za igle; Torbica; Zvit; Ovitek; Tuba; Denarnica; Drugo
th: รูปแบบของที่เก็บเข็ม: หนังสือ; กล่อง; เคส; แฟ้มกระเป๋า; ที่ยึดแม่เหล็ก; แม่เหล็กติดเข็ม; ซอง; ม้วนพับ; ปลอก; หลอด; กระเป๋าพับ; อื่นๆ
hu: Tűtartó stílusa: Könyv; Doboz; Tok; Mappa; Mágneses tartó; Tűőr; Tasak; Feltekerhető; Bújtatós tok; Henger; Pénztárca; Egyéb
sk-SK: Štýl držiaka ihly: Kniha; Škatuľka; Puzdro; Zakladač; Magnetický držiak; Magnet na ihlu; Vrecko; Zrolovateľné; Obal; Tuba; Peňaženka; Iné
de: Nadelhalterstil: Buch; Box; Etui; Mappe; Magnethalter; Nadelmagnet; Beutel; Rolletui; Hülle; Röhre; Wallet; Sonstiges
ru: Стиль держателя иглы: Книга; Коробка; Футляр; Фолио; Магнитный держатель; Магнит для игл; Мешочек; Сворачивающийся; Чехол-конверт; Тубус; Кошелек; Другой
nl: Naaldhouderstijl: Boek; Doos; Etui; Map; Magnetische houder; Naaldenmagneet; Zakje; Oprolbaar; Hoes; Koker; Mapje; Anders
fr: Type de porte-aiguille: Livre; Boîte; Étui; Folio; Support magnétique; Aimant à aiguilles; Pochette; À rouler; Fourreau; Tube; Portefeuille; Autre
es: Estilo del portaagujas: Libro; Caja; Estuche; Portafolio; Soporte magnético; Imán para agujas; Funda; Enrollable; Funda; Tubo; Cartera; Otro
pl: Styl uchwytu igły: Książeczka; Pudełko; Etui; Składane etui; Uchwyt magnetyczny; Magnes na igły; Woreczek; Zwijane etui; Wsuwka; Tuba; Portfel; Inne